Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.  ORS 243.672 is amended to read:
243.672. (1) It is an unfair  labor practice for a public employer or its designated representative
to do any of the following:
(a) Interfere with, restrain  or coerce employees in or because of the exercise of rights guaran-
teed in ORS 243.662.
(b) Dominate, interfere with or assist in the formation, existence or  administration of any em-
ployee  organization.
(c) Discriminate  in regard to hiring, tenure or any terms or condition of employment for the
purpose of encouraging or discouraging membership in an employee  organization. Nothing in this
section is intended to prohibit the entering  into of a fair-share agreement between a public employer
and the exclusive bargaining representative of its employees.  If a “fair-share” agreement has been
agreed to by  the public employer and exclusive representative, nothing prohibits the deduction of
the payment-in-lieu-of-dues from the salaries or wages of the employees.
(d) Discharge or otherwise discriminate  against an employee because the employee has signed
or filed an affidavit, petition or complaint or has  given information or testimony under ORS 243.650
to 243.809.
(e) Refuse to bargain collectively in good faith with the exclusive representative.
(f) Refuse or fail to comply with any provision of ORS 243.650 to 243.809.
(g) Violate the provisions of any written contract with respect to  employment relations includ-
ing an agreement to arbitrate or to accept the terms of an arbitration award, where previously the
parties have agreed to accept arbitration awards as final and binding upon them.
(h) Refuse to reduce an agreement, reached as  a result of collective bargaining, to writing and
sign the resulting contract.
(i) Violate ORS 243.670 (2).
(j) Attempt to influence  an employee to resign from or decline to obtain membership in a labor
organization.
(k) Encourage an employee to revoke an authorization  for the deductions described under ORS
243.806.
(2) Subject to the limitations set forth in this subsection, it is an unfair labor practice for a
public employee or for a labor organization or  its designated representative to do any of the fol-
lowing:
Enrolled House Bill 2864 (HB 2864-INTRO) Page 1
(a) Interfere with, restrain or coerce any employee in or because of the exercise of any right
guaranteed under ORS 243.650 to 243.809.
(b) Refuse to bargain collectively in good faith with the public employer if the labor organization
is an exclusive representative.
(c) Refuse or fail to comply with any provision of ORS 243.650 to 243.809.
(d) Violate the  provisions of any written contract with respect to employment relations, includ-
ing an agreement to arbitrate or to accept the terms of an arbitration award, where previously the
parties have agreed to accept arbitration awards as final and binding upon them.
(e) Refuse to reduce an agreement,  reached as a result of collective bargaining, to writing and
sign the resulting contract.
(3) It is an unfair labor practice for any labor organization to engage  in unconventional strike
activity not protected  for private sector employees under the National Labor Relations Act on June
6, 1995. This provision applies to sitdown, slowdown, rolling, intermittent  or on-and-off again strikes.
(4) It is an unfair labor practice  for a labor organization or its agents to picket or cause, induce,
or encourage to be picketed, or threaten to engage in such  activity, at the residence or business
premises of any individual who  is a member of the governing body of a public employer, with respect
to a dispute over a collective  bargaining agreement or negotiations over employment relations, if
an objective or effect of such picketing is to induce another person to cease doing  business with the
governing body member’s business or to cease handling, transporting or dealing in  goods or services
produced at the governing body’s business. For purposes of this  subsection, a member of the Legis-
lative Assembly is a member of the governing body of a public employer when the collective  bar-
gaining negotiation or dispute is between the  State of Oregon and a labor organization. The
Governor and other statewide  elected officials are not considered members of a governing body for
purposes of this subsection. Nothing in this subsection  may be interpreted or applied in a manner
that violates the right of free  speech and assembly as protected by the Constitution of the United
States or the Constitution of the State of Oregon.
(5) It is not an unfair labor practice or a violation of subsection (2)(a) of  this section for the
exclusive representative of an appropriate bargaining unit to charge the  following employees in the
unit reasonable fees and costs for representation that are unrelated to the negotiation of a collective
bargaining agreement, provided that the employees are not members of  the labor organization that
is the exclusive representative and have not voluntarily entered into a fair-share agreement:
(a) A police officer of a city or municipal police department;
(b) A sheriff or deputy sheriff; [ or]
(c) A police officer commissioned by a university under ORS 352.121 or 353.125[ .];
(d) An employee of  the Department of Corrections or of Oregon Corrections Enterprises;
or
(e) A parole or probation officer who supervises adult offenders.
(6) An injured party may file a  written complaint with the Employment Relations Board not
later than 180 days following the occurrence of  an unfair labor practice. For each unfair labor
practice complaint filed, a  fee of $300 is imposed. For each answer to an unfair labor practice
complaint filed with the board, a fee of $300 is imposed. The board may allow  any other person to
intervene in the proceeding and to  present testimony. A person allowed to intervene shall pay a fee
of $300 to the board. The board may, in its  discretion, order fee reimbursement to the prevailing
party in any case in which the complaint or  answer is found to have been frivolous or filed in bad
faith. The board shall deposit fees  received under this section to the credit of the Employment Re-
lations Board Administrative Account.
Enrolled House Bill 2864 (HB 2864-INTRO) Page 2
Passed by House March 14, 2023
..................................................................................
Timothy G. Sekerak, Chief Clerk of House
..................................................................................
Dan Rayfield, Speaker of House
Passed by Senate April 24, 2023
..................................................................................
Rob Wagner, President of Senate
Received by Governor:
........................M.,........................................................., 2023
Approved:
........................M.,........................................................., 2023
..................................................................................
Tina Kotek, Governor
Filed in Office of Secretary of State:
........................M.,........................................................., 2023
..................................................................................
Shemia Fagan, Secretary of State
Enrolled House Bill 2864 (HB 2864-INTRO) Page 3